Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5064.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4a. (1) Not more than 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the state court administrative office shall, after consultation with the Michigan state housing development authority created under section 21 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1421, create a form that contains all of the following information: (a) A summary of a tenant's rights under this act, 1972 PA 348, MCL 554.601 to 554.616, the housing law of Michigan, 1917 PA 167, MCL 125.401 to 125.543, and the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.101 to 600.9947. (b) A list of legal resources that are available to a tenant who alleges that a rental agreement violates this act, 1972 PA 348, MCL 554.601 to 554.616, the housing law of Michigan, 1917 PA 167, MCL 125.401 to 125.543, or the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.101 to 600.9947. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the summary of a tenant's rights required under subsection (1) must be in 12-point boldface type. The summary of a tenant's rights about a release from rental payment obligation when a tenant is under apprehension of danger from domestic violence, criminal sexual conduct, or stalking as provided under section 1b of 1972 PA 348, MCL 554.601b, must be in 14-point boldface type. (3) The state court administrative office must have copies of the form available in its office and make the form easily accessible on its website. (4) Not later than 60 days after the state court administrative office creates the form required under subsection (1), both of the following apply to a form created pursuant to subsection (1): (a) The form must be attached as an addendum to a lease agreement provided to a tenant in this state. (b) A landlord shall post the form in a common area on the premises. As used in this subdivision, "common area" means a portion of a premises that is generally accessible to all occupants of the premises. Common area includes, but is not limited to, a hallway, stairway, laundry and recreational room, mailbox room, playground, community center, or garage.